Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1378.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 68THIRD-PARTY ACCESS TO DENTAL INSURANCE CONTRACTSSec.6801. Definitions.6802. Leasing.§ 6801. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affiliate." A company that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with another company."Children's Health Insurance Program." As defined under 12345678910111213141516171819 section 9103 (relating to definitions)."Contracting entity." A person or entity that enters into a direct contract with a provider for the delivery of dental services in the ordinary course of business, including a third-party administrator or a dental carrier."Dental benefits plan." A benefits plan that pays or provides dental expense benefits for covered dental services and is delivered or issued for delivery in this Commonwealth by or through a dental carrier or on a stand-alone basis."Dental carrier." A dental insurance company, dental service corporation or dental plan organization authorized to provide a dental benefits plan in this Commonwealth or a health benefits plan in this Commonwealth that includes coverage for dental services."Dental service." A service for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment or cure of a dental condition, illness, injury or disease. The term shall not include a service delivered by a provider under a health benefits plan that is billed as a medical service under the health benefits plan."Medical assistance." As defined under section 4802 (relating to definitions)."Provider network contract." A contract between a contracting entity and a provider specifying the rights and responsibilities of the contracting entity and providing for the delivery of and payment for dental services to covered persons."Third party." A person or entity that enters into a contract with a contracting entity or with another third party to gain access to the dental services or contractual discounts of a provider network contract. The term shall not include an employer or other group for which the contracting entity or 20260SB1378PN1814 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dental carrier provides administrative services, including the payment of claims.§ 6802. Leasing.(a) Access to provider network contract allowed.--A contracting entity may grant a third party access to the following, subject to the requirements of subsections (b) and (c):(1) A provider network contract.(2) A provider's dental services or contractual discounts provided pursuant to a provider network contract.(b) Access not required.--At the time the contract is entered into, sold, leased or renewed or when material modifications are made to a contract relevant to granting access to a provider network contract to a third party, the dental carrier shall allow any provider that is part of the carrier's provider network to choose not to participate in third-party access to the contract or to enter into a contract directly with the third party that acquired the provider network. If the original dental carrier leases the provider network and a provider chooses not to participate in third-party access to the provider network, the provider may not be required to cancel or otherwise end the contractual relationship with the original dental carrier.(c) Requirements for access.--A contracting entity may grant a third party access to a provider network contract or a provider's dental services or contractual discounts provided pursuant to a provider network contract if:(1) The contract specifically states:(i) That the contracting entity may enter into an agreement with a third party, allowing the third party to 20260SB1378PN1814 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 obtain the contracting entity's rights and responsibilities as if the third party were the contracting entity.(ii) If the contracting entity is a dental carrier, that the provider chose to participate in third-party access at the time the provider network contract was entered into or renewed.(2) The third party accessing the contract agrees to comply with all of the contract's terms, including the third party's obligation concerning patient steerage.(3) The contracting entity identifies to the provider, in writing or electronic form, each third party in existence as of the date the contract is entered into, sold, leased or renewed.(4) The contracting entity identifies all third parties in existence in a list on the entity's publicly accessible Internet website, which must be updated at least once every 90 days.(5) The contracting entity requires each third party to identify the source of the discount on all remittance advices or explanations of payment under which a discount is taken. This paragraph shall not apply to electronic transactions mandated by The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936).(6) The contracting entity notifies the third party of termination of a provider network contract no later than 30 days from the termination date with the contracting entity.(7) A third party's right to a provider's discounted rate ceases as of the termination date of the provider 20260SB1378PN1814 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 network contract. The contracting entity shall make available a copy of the provider network contract relied on in the adjudication of a claim to a provider within 30 days of a request from the provider.(8) The third-party access provision of any provider contract is clearly identified in the provider contract, including notice that the contract grants third-party access to the provider network and that the dentist has the right to choose not to participate in third-party access.(d) Discounted reimbursement not required.--A provider shall not be bound by or required to perform dental services for discounted reimbursement under a provider network contract that has been granted to a third party in violation of subsection (c)(1), (2), (3), (4) or (8).(e) Waiver not permitted.--The provisions of this section shall not be waived by contract. A contractual arrangement in conflict with the provisions of this section or that purports to waive any requirements of this section shall be null and void and unenforceable.(f) Rules and regulations.--The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, which shall include penalty provisions for violations of this chapter.(g) Applicability.--(1) The provisions of this section shall not apply to:(i) Access to a provider network contract that is granted to a dental carrier or an entity operating in accordance with the same brand licensee program as the contracting entity or to an entity that is an affiliate of the contracting entity. A list of the contracting 20260SB1378PN1814 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entity's affiliates must be made available to a provider on the contracting entity's publicly accessible Internet website.(ii) A provider network contract for dental services provided to beneficiaries of State-sponsored health programs, including Medicare, medical assistance and the Children's Health Insurance Program.(2) This chapter shall apply to provider network contracts delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this Commonwealth on or after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1378PN1814 - 6 - 123456789101112